Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110
Land surveying; examining board; duties.

(1) An examining board shall be established for the purpose of administering the Land Surveyors Regulation Act. The examining board shall be independent of all other examining boards.

(2) The board shall enforce the Land Surveyors Regulation Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act. If any person violates the act, any rule or regulation under the act, or any decision or order of the board, upon the request of the board the Attorney General or the appropriate county attorney shall file an action for the enforcement of the act, rule or regulation, or decision or order and for injunctive relief, if appropriate, in the district court.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 3, p. 1333;

Laws 1969, c. 514, § 6, p. 2106;

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 20.
September 1, 2024